src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Sakirabiá language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
naat+V+Aux+Cop:naat # ;
ne+V+Aux+Cop:ne # ;
nop+V+Aux+Neg:nop # ;
pa+V+Aux+Fut:pa # ;
kot+V+Aux+ImFut:kot # ;
kaap+V+Aux+Quo:kaap # ;
eba+V+Aux+Evid:eba # ;
kop+V+Aux:kop # "aux.mov/" ;
to+V:to TAM_ "aux.lie/" ;


ʼat+v1+V:ʼa%{tr%} TAM_ "get/" ;
ʼat+v2+V:a%{tr%} TAM_ "get/" ;
erek+V:ere%{kg%} TAM_ "speak/" ;
et+V:e%{tr%} TAM_ "sleep/"   ;
iʼat+V:iʼa%{tr%} TAM_ "catch something/pegar algo" ;
ka+V:ka TAM_ "move/" ;
kerep+V:kere%{pbØ%} TAM_ "enter/" ;
ko+V:ko TAM_ "ingest: eat, drink, smoke, copulate/" ;
kõjẽ+V:kõjẽ TAM_ "sit/" ;
kwakso+V:kwakso TAM_ "hear/" ;
ma+V:ma TAM_ "make/" ;
maj+V:maj TAM_ "tell/" ;
ot+V:o%{tr%} TAM_ "leave/" ;
õp+V:õ%{pbØ%} TAM_ "give/dar" ;
pek+V:pe%{kg%} TAM_ "call/chamar" ;
pia+V:pia TAM_ "wait/" ;
piora+V:piora TAM_ "dig/" ;
pɨbot+V:pɨbo%{tr%} TAM_ "arrive/chegar" ;
porẽsopek+V:porẽsope%{kg%} TAM_ "ask/perguntar" ;
set+V:se%{tr%} TAM_ "" ;
so+V:so TAM_ "see/" ;
toorekwa+V:toorekwa TAM_ "laugh/" ;
ngwẽrep+V:ngwẽre%{pbØ%} TAM_ "end/acabar" ;!is this a verb?


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
